en: Fortified wines such as natural sweet wines, VDN
fr: vins mutés de type vin doux naturel, VDN
hr: Pojačana vina kao što su prirodna slatka vina
it: Vini liquorosi come vini dolci naturali
nl: Zoete versterkte wijnen

en: Rosé wines, rosé wine
ca: Vi rosat
de: Roséweine, Roséwein
es: Vinos rosados
fi: rosé-viinit
fr: Vins rosés, vin rosé
hr: Ružičasta vina
hu: Rozéborok, Rozé borok
it: Vini rosé
nl: Rosé wijnen, Rosé wijn, Rosé

en: 11% rosé wine
fr: Vin rosé 11°, Vin rosé 11 degrés
zh: 11% 桃红葡萄酒

en: Dried products, dehydrated products, Dried foods, Dehydrated foods
bg: Сушени продукти
ca: Productes secs, deshidratats
da: Tørrede produkter, Dehydrerede fødevarer
de: Getrocknete Produkte
es: Productos deshidratados, Productors deshidratados, alimentos deshidratados, Alimentos secos, Alimentos desecados
fi: kuivatut tuotteet
fr: Produits déshydratés, produits lyophilisés, produits séchés, aliments séchés, Aliments secs
he: מוצרים מיובשים, מוצרים יבשים
hr: Sušeni proizvodi
hu: Szárított termékek, Szárított élelmiszerek
it: Prodotti disidratati
ja: 乾物
lt: Džiovinti produktai, dehidratuoti produktai, džiovinti maisto produktai, dehidratuoti maisto produktai
nl: Gedroogde producten, Gedroogd product
pl: Produkty suszone, produkty poddane dehydratacji, żywność suszona
pt: Produtos secos, produtos desidratados, Alimentos secos, Alimentos desidratados
ru: Обезвоженные продукты
th: อาหารแห้ง
tr: Kurutulmuş ürünler
zh: 干制品

en: Dried products to be rehydrated
ca: Productes assecats per a ser rehidratats
de: Getrocknete Produkte zur Rehydrierung
es: Productos deshidratados para ser rehidratados
fi: joihin lisätään vettä
fr: Produits lyophilisés à reconstituer, produits déshydratés à reconstituer, produits à reconstituer
he: מוצרים מיובשים להוספת מים מחדש
hr: Sušeni proizvodi koji se rehidriraju
hu: Szárított, rehidratálandó termékek
it: Prodotti disidratati da reidratare
lt: Džiovinti produktai kuriuos reikia rehidratuoti
nl: Gedroogde producten om te hydrateren
pt: Produtos secos a serem rehidratados
zh: 复水干燥食品

en: Meal kits, Kits for meals
fi: ateriakitit
fr: Kits repas, Kits pour repas, Kits culinaires, Kit repas, Kit pour repas, Kit culinaire
hr: Setovi obroka
nl: Maaltijdpakketten
zh: 快煮餐

en: Fajitas kits
fr: Kit pour fajitas

en: Dehydrated beverages, dehydrated drinks
de: Getrocknete Getränke, Getränkepulver
es: Bebidas deshidratadas
fi: kuivatetut juomat
fr: Boissons lyophilisées, Boisson lyophilisée, boissons déshydratées
hr: Dehidrirana pića
it: Bevande disidratate
lt: Gėrimai miltelių pagrindu
nl: Gedroogde drankpoeders
pt: Bebidas desidratadas
ru: Растворимые напитки

en: Instant mashed potatoes, dehydrated mashed potatoes
da: Kartoffelmospulvere
de: Kartoffelpulver
fi: perunamuusijauheet
fr: Purées de pommes de terre en flocons, purées de pommes de terre instantanées, Purées en flocons, purées instantanées
hr: Instant pire krumpir
it: Puré di patate istantaneo
ja: インスタントマッシュポテト
lt: Greito pagaminimo bulvės, Greito pagaminimo bulvių košės
nl: Aardappelpureeën in gedroogde vorm, Aardappelpuree in gedroogde vorm, Aardappelpoeder
sv: Potatismospulver, Kartoffelmospulver

en: Potato puree made from flakes reconstituted with whole milk with added fat
fr: Purée de pommes de terre à base de flocons reconstituée avec lait entier

en: Unsalted potato puree with milk and butter
fr: Purée de pommes de terre non salée au lait et au beurre

en: Unsalted Potato puree made from flakes reconstituted with semi-skimmed milk and water
fr: Purée de pommes de terre non salée à base de flocons reconstituée avec lait demi-écrémé et eau

en: Potato flakes
da: Kartoffelflager
fr: Flocons de pommes de terre

en: Dehydrated potato flakes with milk, Dehydrated potato flakes with cream
fr: Purée de pommes de terre en flocons au lait, Purée de pommes de terre en flocons à la crème

en: Biscuits and cakes
bg: Бисквити и сладкиши
ca: Galetes i pastissos
da: Kiks og kage
de: Kekse und Kuchen
es: Galletas y pasteles
fi: Keksit ja kakut
fr: Biscuits et gâteaux
he: עוגיות ועוגות
hr: Keksi i kolači
hu: Kekszek és sütemények
it: Biscotti e torte, Biscotti e dolci
lt: Sausainiai ir pyragai, Sausainiai ir tortai
nl: Koekjes en cakes
no: Kjeks og kaker
pt: Biscoitos e Bolos
ro: Biscuiți și prăjituri
ru: Пироги и печенье
sv: Kakor och tårtor
th: ขนมปังกรอบและเค๊ก
tr: Bisküviler ve kekler
zh: 饼干和蛋糕

en: Cake with almond flavoured filling
de: Kuchen met Marzipangeschmak-Füllung
fr: Gäteau fourré goût amande
hr: Kolač s nadjevom s okusom badema
nl: Gevulde Koeken

en: Biscuits and crackers
fr: Biscuits sucrés & biscuits apéritifs
nl: Biscuits en crackers
zh: 饼干和薄脆饼干

en: Biscuits, biscuit, cookies, cookie
ar: بسكويت
az: Biskvit
bg: Бисквити
br: Gwispid
ca: Galetes, galeta
cs: Sušenky
cy: Bisged
da: kiks
de: Kekse, Biskuit
el: Μπισκότο
eo: biskvito
es: Galletas, galleta
eu: Gaileta
fa: بیسکویت
fi: Keksit
fr: biscuits, biscuit, biscuits sucrés, biscuit sucré
ga: Briosca
gd: Briosgaid
gl: Galleta
he: ביסקוויט
hr: Keksi, Keks, biskviti, biskvit
hu: Kekszek, Keksz
hy: բիսկվիտ
id: Biskuit
io: Bisquito
is: Kex
it: Biscotti, biscotto
ja: ビスケット
ko: 비스킷
ku: Hindok
lt: Sausainiai, Sausainis
mk: бисквит
ms: Biskut
nb: kjeks
nl: Koekjes, biscuit, biscuits
nn: Kjeks
oc: biscuèit
pl: herbatnik
pt: biscoitos, Biscoito
ro: Biscuiți, Biscuit, Fursecuri, biscuiti
ru: бисквит
si: විස්කොටටුහ්
so: Buskud
sr: бисквит
sv: Kex
ta: மாச்சில்லு
th: บิสกิต
tl: Biskwit
tr: Bisküvi
uk: Бісквіт
ur: بسکٹ
vi: Bích quy
wa: Biscûte
zh: 面饼

en: Biscuits or Cookies (Perishable)
de: Kekse oder Gebäck (leicht verderblich)

en: Biscuits or cookies variety packs
de: Mischpackungen von Kekse und Gebäck
es: Paquetes variados de galletas y bizcochos
fr: Assortiments de gâteaux secs et biscuits
hr: Pakiranja keksa ili kolačića
it: Confezioni Miste di biscotti e crackers
nl: Biscuit- en koekjesassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de biscoitos y bolachas